src/morphology/stems/punctuation.lexc
LEXICON Punctuation

! Clause boundary symbols

%,+CLB:%,   # ;
%.+CLB:%.   # ;
%.%.%.+CLB:%.%.%.   # ;
%:+CLB:%:   # ;
%;+CLB:%;	  # ;
^excl+CLB:%!	  # ;
%?+CLB:%?	  # ;

! Single punctuation marks

%§+PUNCT:%§ # ;
%%§+PUNCT:%§%§ # ;
%-+PUNCT:%-  # ;
%-%-+PUNCT:%-%-  # ;
–+PUNCT:– # ; !endash
—+PUNCT:— # ; !emdash
%=+PUNCT:%=  # ;
%%+PUNCT:%%  # ;
%&+PUNCT:%& # ;
%"+PUNCT:%"  # ;
%'+PUNCT:%'  # ;
%*+PUNCT:%*  # ;
%++PUNCT:%+  # ;
%`+PUNCT:%`  # ;


! Paired punctuation marks

%«+PUNCT+LEFT:%«  # ;
%»+PUNCT+RIGHT:%»  # ;
%(+PUNCT+LEFT:%(  # ;
%)+PUNCT+RIGHT:%)  # ;
%[+PUNCT+LEFT:%[  # ;
%]+PUNCT+RIGHT:%]  # ;
%{+PUNCT+LEFT:%{  # ;
%}+PUNCT+RIGHT:%}  # ;
